Tennessee, session 114, HB1253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-312(a), is amended by deleting
the language "twenty (20)" and substituting instead the language "thirty (30)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-814(d), is amended by deleting
subdivision (2) and substituting instead the following:
(2) The six (6) work weeks of paid leave granted pursuant to this section must
be taken consecutively, except in extenuating circumstances, as determined and
approved by the director of schools or the director of the public charter school, as
applicable, and must be used within twelve (12) months of the birth or stillbirth of the
employee's child or the employee's adoption of a newly placed minor child.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1253
003235
- 1 -